Utah statutes.
32A-11a-109 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Sale or transfer of supplier's business.
(1) (a)  A successor to a supplier that after July 1, 1998, acquires a
supplier's products or brands in this state shall be bound by all of the terms
and conditions of each distributorship agreement with a wholesaler in this
state that was in effect on the date on which the successor received the
assets or rights of the previous supplier.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a), a successor may contractually require
its wholesalers to:
(i)  execute a new distributorship agreement; and
(ii)  comply with the successor's operational standards of performance if:
(A)  the operational standards of performance are consistent with this
chapter;
(B)  the operational standards of performance are uniformly imposed by the
successor on similarly situated wholesalers; and
(C)  the successor provides the wholesaler at least one year to:
(I)  execute a new distributorship agreement; and
(II)  comply with the operational standards of performance.
(2) (a)  For purposes of this section, "successor" means a supplier who
obtains the distribution rights of a brand that a wholesaler distributes in
this state pursuant to a distributorship agreement with another supplier who
previously had the distribution rights of the brand.
(b)  For purposes of Subsection (2)(a), the successor may obtain the
distribution right:
(i)  by any means, including:
(A)  merger;
(B)  purchase of corporate shares; or
(C)  purchase of assets; and
(ii)  from:
(A)  a supplier; or
(B)  a person acting in an official capacity who is not a supplier including a
nominee, representative, or fiduciary.
